Wyoming statutes. Title 20 Domestic Relations
Article 4. Enforcement

Federal law. —

For related federal provisions, see 42 U.S.C.S. § 11601 et seq.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 4 makes the article effective July 1, 2005.

§ 20-5-401.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Petitioner” means a person who seeks enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination;

“Respondent” means a person against whom a proceeding has been commenced for enforcement of an order for return of a child under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction or enforcement of a child custody determination.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 20-5-402.
Enforcement under the Hague Convention.

Under this article, a court of this state may enforce an order for the return of the child made under the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction as if it were a child custody determination.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 20-5-403.
Duty to enforce.

A court of this state shall recognize and enforce a child custody determination of a court of another state if the latter court exercised jurisdiction in substantial conformity with this act or the determination was made under factual circumstances meeting the jurisdictional standards of this act and the determination has not been modified in accordance with this act.

A court of this state may utilize any remedy available under other law of this state to enforce a child custody determination made by a court of another state. The remedies provided in this article are cumulative and do not affect the availability of other remedies to enforce a child custody determination.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-404.
Temporary visitation.

A court of this state which does not have jurisdiction to modify a child custody determination may issue a temporary order enforcing:

A visitation schedule made by a court of another state; or

The visitation provisions of a child custody determination of another state that does not provide for a specific visitation schedule.

If a court of this state makes an order under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, it shall specify in the order a period that it considers adequate to allow the petitioner to obtain an order from a court having jurisdiction under the criteria specified in article 3 of this act. The order remains in effect until an order is obtained from the other court or the period expires.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

Editor's notes. —

The following annotations are taken from cases decided under prior law.

Order compelling visitation proper exercise of discretion. —

District court's order compelling the mother to deliver the children to Wyoming for visitation was a proper exercise of discretion under the district court's continuing jurisdiction as the decree court; the district court's order was appropriate to enforce visitation and, consequently, not some character of child custody decree modification. Marquiss v. Marquiss, 837 P.2d 25,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1992), reh'g denied,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. Aug. 18, 1992).

§ 20-5-405.
Registration of child custody determination.

A child custody determination issued by a court of another state may be registered in this state, with or without a simultaneous request for enforcement, by sending to the appropriate court in this state:

A letter or other document requesting registration;

Two (2) copies, including one (1) certified copy, of the determination sought to be registered, and a statement under penalty of perjury that to the best of the knowledge and belief of the person seeking registration the order has not been modified; and

Except as otherwise provided in W.S.

20-5-309

, the name and address of the person seeking registration and any parent or person acting as a parent who has been awarded custody or visitation in the child custody determination sought to be registered.

On receipt of the documents required by subsection (a) of this section, the registering court shall:

Cause the determination to be filed as a foreign judgment, together with one (1) copy of any accompanying documents and information, regardless of their form; and

Serve notice upon the persons named pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii) of this section and provide them with an opportunity to contest the registration in accordance with this section.

The notice required by paragraph (b)(ii) of this section shall state that:

A registered determination is enforceable as of the date of the registration in the same manner as a determination issued by a court of this state;

A hearing to contest the validity of the registered determination must be requested within twenty (20) days after service of notice; and

Failure to contest the registration will result in confirmation of the child custody determination and preclude further contest of that determination with respect to any matter that could have been asserted.

A person seeking to contest the validity of a registered order shall request a hearing within twenty (20) days after service of the notice. At that hearing, the court shall confirm the registered order unless the person contesting registration establishes that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act;

The child custody determination sought to be registered has been vacated, stayed or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act; or

The person contesting registration was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with standards under a provision of law from that state in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-208

, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which registration is sought.

If a timely request for a hearing to contest the validity of the registration is not made, the registration is confirmed as a matter of law and the person requesting registration and all persons served shall be notified of the confirmation.

Confirmation of a registered order, whether by operation of law or after notice and hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-406.
Enforcement of registered determination.

A court of this state may grant any relief normally available under the law of this state to enforce a registered child custody determination made by a court of another state.

A court of this state shall recognize and enforce, but shall not modify except in accordance with article 3 of this act, a registered child custody determination of a court of another state.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-407.
Simultaneous proceedings.

If a proceeding for enforcement under this article is commenced in a court of this state and the court determines that a proceeding to modify the determination is pending in a court of another state having jurisdiction to modify the determination under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act, the enforcing court shall immediately communicate with the modifying court. The proceeding for enforcement shall continue unless the enforcing court, after consultation with the modifying court, stays or dismisses the proceeding.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-408.
Expedited enforcement of child custody determination.

A petition under this article in which the petitioner is seeking expedited enforcement shall be verified. Certified copies of all orders sought to be enforced and of any order confirming registration shall be attached to the petition. A copy of a certified copy of an order may be attached instead of the original.

A petition for enforcement of a child custody determination shall state:

Whether the court that issued the determination identified the jurisdictional basis it relied upon in exercising jurisdiction and, if so, what the basis was;

Whether the determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed or modified by a court whose decision is enforceable under this act and, if so, the identity of the court, the case number and the nature of the proceeding;

Whether any proceeding has been commenced that could affect the current proceeding, including proceedings relating to domestic violence, protective orders, termination of parental rights and adoptions and, if so, the identity of the court, the case number and the nature of the proceeding;

The present physical address of the child and the respondent, if known;

Whether relief in addition to the immediate physical custody of the child and attorney fees is sought, including a request for assistance from law enforcement officials and, if so, the relief sought; and

If the child custody determination has been registered and confirmed under W.S.

20-5-405

, the date and place of registration.

Upon the filing of a petition, the court shall issue an order directing the respondent to appear in person with or without the child at a hearing and may enter any order necessary to ensure the safety of the parties and the child. The hearing shall be held on the next judicial day after service of the order unless that date is impossible. In the event that the next judicial day after service of the order is impossible, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The court may extend the date of hearing at the request of the petitioner.

An order issued under subsection (c) of this section shall state the time and place of the hearing and advise the respondent that at the hearing the court will order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child and the payment of fees, costs and expenses under W.S.

20-5-412

, and may schedule a hearing to determine whether further relief is appropriate, unless the respondent appears and establishes either that:

The child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under W.S.

20-5-405

and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act;

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act; or

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-208

, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought.

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-404

, but has been vacated, stayed or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-409.
Service of petition and order.

Except as provided in W.S.

20-5-411

, the petition and order shall be served by any method authorized by the law of this state upon the respondent and any person who has physical custody of the child.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 20-5-410.
Hearing and order.

Unless the court issues a temporary emergency order pursuant to W.S.

20-5-304

, upon a finding that a petitioner is entitled to immediate physical custody of the child, the court shall order that the petitioner may take immediate physical custody of the child unless the respondent establishes either that:

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought was registered and confirmed under W.S.

20-5-405

but has been vacated, stayed or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under article 3 of this act; or

The child custody determination has not been registered and confirmed under W.S.

20-5-405

and that:

The issuing court did not have jurisdiction under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act;

The child custody determination for which enforcement is sought has been vacated, stayed or modified by a court of a state having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act; or

The respondent was entitled to notice, but notice was not given in accordance with the standards under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with W.S.

20-5-208

, in the proceedings before the court that issued the order for which enforcement is sought.

The court shall award the fees, costs and expenses authorized under W.S.

20-5-412

and may grant additional relief, including a request for the assistance of law enforcement officials, and set a further hearing to determine whether additional relief is appropriate.

If a party called to testify refuses to answer on the ground that the testimony may be self-incriminating, the court may draw an adverse inference from the refusal.

A privilege against disclosure of communications between spouses and a defense of immunity based on the relationship of husband and wife or parent and child may not be invoked in a proceeding under this article.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-411.
Warrant to take physical custody of a child.

Upon the filing of a petition seeking enforcement of a child custody determination, the petitioner may file a verified application for the issuance of a warrant to take physical custody of the child if the child is immediately likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state.

If the court, upon the testimony of the petitioner or other witness, finds that the child is imminently likely to suffer serious physical harm or be removed from this state, it may issue a warrant to take physical custody of the child. The petition shall be heard on the next judicial day after the warrant is executed unless that date is impossible. In the event that the next judicial day after service of the order is impossible, the court shall hold the hearing on the first judicial day possible. The application for the warrant shall include the statements required by W.S. 20-5-408(b).

A warrant to take physical custody of a child shall:

Recite the facts upon which a conclusion of imminent serious physical harm or removal from the jurisdiction is based;

Direct law enforcement officers to take physical custody of the child immediately; and

Provide for the placement of the child pending final relief.

The respondent shall be served with the petition, warrant and order immediately after the child is taken into physical custody.

A warrant to take physical custody of a child is enforceable throughout this state. If the court finds on the basis of the testimony of the petitioner or other witness that a less intrusive remedy is not effective, it may authorize law enforcement officers to enter private property to take physical custody of the child. If required by exigent circumstances of the case, the court may authorize law enforcement officers to make a forcible entry at any hour.

The court may impose conditions upon placement of a child to ensure the appearance of the child and the child’s custodian.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 20-5-412.
Costs, fees and expenses.

The court shall award the prevailing party, including a state, necessary and reasonable expenses incurred by or on behalf of the party, including costs, communication expenses, attorney fees, investigative fees, expenses for witnesses, travel expenses and child care during the course of the proceedings, unless the party from whom fees or expenses are sought establishes that the award would be clearly inappropriate.

The court may not assess fees, costs or expenses against a state unless authorized by law other than this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-413.
Recognition and enforcement.

A court of this state shall accord full faith and credit to an order issued by another state and consistent with this act which enforces a child custody determination by a court of another state unless the order has been vacated, stayed or modified by a court having jurisdiction to do so under a provision of law from that state that is in substantial conformity with article 3 of this act.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-414.
Appeals.

An appeal may be taken from a final order in a proceeding under this article in accordance with expedited appellate procedures in other civil cases. Unless the court enters a temporary emergency order under W.S.

20-5-304

, the enforcing court may not stay an order enforcing a child custody determination pending appeal.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 20-5-415.
Role of prosecutor or other appropriate public official.

In a case arising under this act or involving the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction, the prosecutor or other appropriate public official may take any lawful action, including resort to a proceeding under this article or any other available civil proceeding, to locate a child, obtain the return of a child or enforce a child custody determination if there is:

An existing child custody determination;

A request to do so from a court in a pending child custody proceeding;

A reasonable belief that a criminal statute has been violated; or

A reasonable belief that the child has been wrongfully removed or retained in violation of the Hague Convention on the Civil Aspects of International Child Abduction.

A prosecutor or other appropriate public official acting under this section acts on behalf of the court and may not represent any party.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 20-5-202(a)(xviii).

§ 20-5-416.
Role of law enforcement.

At the request of a prosecutor or other appropriate public official acting under W.S.

20-5-415

, a law enforcement officer may take any lawful action reasonably necessary to locate a child or a party and assist a prosecutor or other appropriate public official with responsibilities under W.S.

20-5-415

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.

§ 20-5-417.
Costs and expenses.

If the respondent is not the prevailing party, the court may assess against the respondent all direct expenses and costs incurred by the prosecutor or other appropriate public official and law enforcement officers under W.S.

20-5-415

or

20-5-416

.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 11, § 1.